Washington statutes.
RCW 43.61.060

Donations may be accepted—Procedure for allotment and use.

The department of veterans affairs may receive gifts, donations, and grants from any person or agency and all such gifts, donations, and grants shall be placed in the general fund and may be allotted and used in accordance with the donors' instructions as an unanticipated receipt pursuant to RCW 43.79.270 through 43.79.282 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 59 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.61.060. Prior: 1947 c 110 s 5; RRS s 10758-104.]